Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 1. Indebtedness Generally
§ 1786.
Borrowing to pay current expenses in anticipation of taxes.

A municipal corporation, by its legislative branch, may borrow money by the issuance of its notes or orders for the purpose of paying current expenses of the municipal corporation. Such notes or orders, however, must mature within one year from date.

A municipal corporation may also borrow money in anticipation of taxes in an amount not to exceed ninety percent of the amount of taxes assessed for such year and may issue its notes or orders therefor to mature not more than one year from the date of the note or order.

The assistant judges may borrow money in the name of the county in anticipation of taxes.

§ 1786a.
Borrowing for public improvements and capital assets.

The voters of a municipality may authorize specific public improvements and the acquisition of capital assets and finance the same, temporarily or permanently, through debt instruments other than bonds for a term not to exceed the reasonably anticipated useful life of the improvements or assets as provided in this section.

If the improvements or assets are to be financed for a term of five years or less, they shall be approved by the voters at an annual or special meeting duly warned for the purpose in accordance with the provisions of 17 V.S.A. chapter 55. However, the requirement of this subsection shall not apply to purchases made by selectboards under the provisions of

19 V.S.A. § 304(a)(3)

.

If the improvements or assets are to be financed for a term of more than five years, the procedural provisions of sections 1755, 1756, and 1757 of this title shall apply. A vote on the question shall be held at a duly warned annual or special meeting and shall be by Australian ballot. The ballot shall be in substantially the following form:

“Shall the voters authorize (describe public improvement or acquisition) in an amount not to exceed ($
. . . . . . . . ) to be financed over a period not to exceed (number of years).”

Public improvements or assets approved under subsection (c) of this section may be financed for a period of five years or less.

Debt instruments authorized under this section may be refunded in the manner provided in sections 1771 and 1772 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 2

, § 1, eff. Feb. 23, 1995; amended

2001, No. 64

, § 22, eff. June 16, 2001.

§ 1787.
Application of chapter; charters and special acts to control.

This chapter shall not affect rights allowed a municipal corporation by its charter provisions, nor any rights granted by special act of the Legislature.
This chapter, except where inconsistent with such charter or special act, shall apply to the method of exercising all such rights.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 111

, § 3, eff. June 22, 1989.

§ 1788.
Existing powers continued; emergencies.

The existing power of a municipality to authorize public improvements by a majority vote in a meeting duly called and held and to finance the same temporarily by the issue of orders or notes, and to issue bonds therefor, is not repealed nor affected by the provisions of this subchapter.
Such municipality may refund all or any portion of such temporary orders, notes, or bonds in the method provided by sections 1771 and 1772 of this title.
Nevertheless, no public improvement which has been voted upon in the method provided by sections 1755 and 1756 of this title shall be voted upon in any such meeting, except in cases of emergency, in which the vote stating the emergency shall be conclusive evidence of its existence.
The existing power of a municipality to refund obligations representing indebtedness accumulated in the ordinary administration of the affairs of such municipality, whether incurred for public improvements or for current expenses, and with or without vote of such municipality, is not repealed nor affected by the provisions of this subchapter, except that the method of such refunding shall be as provided in sections 1771 and 1772 of this title.

§ 1789.
Alternative financing of assets.

A municipality, including a fire district, either singly or as a participant in an interlocal contract entered into under sections 4901 and 4902 of this title, may acquire personal property, fixtures, technology, and intellectual property by means of leases, lease-purchase agreements, installment sales agreements, and similar agreements wherein payment and performance on the part of the municipality is conditioned expressly upon the annual approval by the municipality of an appropriation sufficient to pay when next due rents, charges, and other payments accruing under such leases and agreements.

The legislative body of the municipality shall enter into leases and agreements identified in subsection (a) of this section on behalf of the municipality and under such terms as it deems to be in the best interest of the municipality.

The undertaking of a municipality to make payments under a lease or agreement identified in subsection (a) of this section shall not be a general or special obligation of the municipality, but shall be treated as a current operating expense. Payments made or to be made under such lease or agreement shall not be taken into account in calculating the debt limit of a municipality for any purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 5, eff. June 9, 2007.